test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AW_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲áw - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AW_STEM_1

     sg̲áw+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲áw
     sg̲áw+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áwga
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw
     sg̲áw+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áwgang
     sg̲áw+V+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲áwgan
     sg̲áw+V+RELATIVE: sg̲áws
     sg̲áw+V+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwang
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang
     sg̲áw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwganggang
     sg̲áw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwgangang
     sg̲áw+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgiinii
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲áwäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲áwäs
     sg̲áw+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲áwäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲áwäsga
     sg̲áw+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áwäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲áw+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲áw+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲áw+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'uuj
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲áwäsaa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'us
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'ujaa
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'uujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áwäsaa'us
     sg̲áw+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲áwäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲áwäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲áw'uu
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'wägan
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'aawaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'aawaan
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'waas
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲áw'aawaas
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'waa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'aawaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang'waa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang'waang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwgang'waa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'wägiinii
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'wägaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'wägaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲áw'waaäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲áw'waaäs
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waaäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waaäsga
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waaäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'waaäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa'uuj
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲áw'waaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa'us
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'waa'ujaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'waa'uujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waaäsaa'us
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲áw'waa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲áw'waa'ahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'waa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'aawaa'ahlang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲áw'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲áw'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲áw'waa'ahl
     sg̲áw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲áw'waaäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲áw'ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'angga
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'anggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'anggan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'aangaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'aangaan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'ans
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲áw'aangaas
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'angang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'aangaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'anggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang'anggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwgang'angang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'anggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'anggaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'anggaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲áw'angäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲áw'angäs
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'angäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'angäsga
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'angäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'angäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'uuj
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲áw'angäsaa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'us
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'ujaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'uujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'angäsaa'us
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲áw'aang'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲áw'aang'ahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'aang'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲áw'angäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'aang'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'aangaa'ahlang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲áw'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲áw'aangaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sg̲áw'aang'ahl
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲áw'angäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲áw'ang'uu
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'wägan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'aawaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'aawaan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waas
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲áw'ang'aawaas
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'ang'aawaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang'ang'waa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲áwgang'ang'waang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áwgang'ang'waa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'wägiinii
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'wägaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'wägaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲áw'ang'waaäs
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsga
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲áw'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa'uuj
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa'us
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ujaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaa'us
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ahlans
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲áw'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲áw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲áw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waa'ahl
     sg̲áw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲áw'ang'waaäseehl
